District of Columbia statutes.
19-602.22

Payment on multiple-party account.

A financial institution, on request, may pay sums on deposit in a multiple-party account to:

(1)

One or more of the parties, whether or not another party has a disability, is incapacitated, or deceased when payment is requested and whether or not the party making the request survives another party; or

(2)

The personal representative, if any, or, if there is none, the heirs or devisees of a deceased party, if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the deceased party was the survivor of all other persons named on the account, either as a party or beneficiary, unless the account is without right of survivorship under section 19-602.12.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 33(b), 53 DCR 6198
D.C. Law 16-305, in par. (1), substituted “has a disability” for “is disabled”.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 222 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).